Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 30-100.
Declaration of legislative policy; construction.

The General Assembly, recognizing that our system of representative government is dependent in part upon (i) citizen legislative members representing fully the public in the legislative process and (ii) its citizens maintaining the highest trust in their public officers, finds and declares that the citizens are entitled to be assured that the judgment of the members of the General Assembly will not be compromised or affected by inappropriate conflicts.

The provisions of this chapter do not preclude prosecution for any violation of any criminal law of the Commonwealth, including Articles 2 (Bribery and Related Offenses, §

18.2-438

et seq.) and 3 (Bribery of Public Servants and Party Officials, §

18.2-446

et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 18.2, and do not constitute a defense to any prosecution for such a violation.

This chapter shall apply to the members of the General Assembly.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purpose.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.30; 2001, c. 844; 2014, cc. 792, 804.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 409, cl. 1 provides: “It shall be the policy of the Commonwealth that no state-funded institution, building, park, road, bridge, or other structure shall be named after a sitting member of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2002, c. 409, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any institution, building, park, road or bridge named prior to July 1, 2002, whether or not construction has begun or has been completed.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and added the second paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Members of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission who also are legislators

Are subject to all applicable provisions of the General Assembly Conflicts Act in their service on the Commission. However, the only transactions for which this Act requires disqualification are transactions with the General Assembly. Thus, the General Assembly Conflicts Act will not come into play for transactions of the Commission, and it will not require any legislator to disqualify himself from transactions of the Commission. A legislator does remain subject to State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act in his capacity as a member of the Commission, and if Act requires him to disqualify himself from a transaction, the savings clause would apply. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-076,
(2/6/15).

“Governmental agency.” —

Tourism Council meets the definition of “governmental agency” under the Virginia State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act, and its officers and employees are therefore subject to applicable prohibitions and requirements of that Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas K. Norment Jr., Member, Senate of Virginia,
19-023,
(8/16/19).

§ 30-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Advisory agency”
means any board, commission, committee or post which does not exercise any sovereign power or duty, but is appointed by a governmental agency or officer or is created by law for the purpose of making studies or recommendations, or advising or consulting with a governmental agency.

“Business”
means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, trust or foundation, or any other individual or entity carrying on a business or profession, whether or not for profit.

“Candidate”
means a person who seeks or campaigns for election to the General Assembly in a general, primary, or special election and who is qualified to have his name placed on the ballot for the office. The candidate shall become subject to the provisions of this section upon the filing of a statement of qualification pursuant to §

24.2-501

. The State Board of Elections shall notify each such candidate of the provisions of this chapter.

“Contract”
means any agreement to which a governmental agency is a party, or any agreement on behalf of a governmental agency that involves the payment of money appropriated by the General Assembly or a political subdivision, whether or not such agreement is executed in the name of the Commonwealth, or some political subdivision thereof. “Contract” includes a subcontract only when the contract of which it is a part is with the legislator’s own governmental agency.

“Council”
means the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council established in § 30-355.

“Financial institution”
means any bank, trust company, savings institution, industrial loan association, consumer finance company, credit union, broker-dealer as defined in subsection A of §

13.1-501

, or investment company or advisor registered under the federal Investment Advisors Act or Investment Company Act of 1940.

“Gift”
means any gratuity, favor, discount, entertainment, hospitality, loan, forbearance, or other item having monetary value. It includes services as well as gifts of transportation, lodgings and meals, whether provided in-kind, by purchase of a ticket, payment in advance, or reimbursement after the expense has been incurred. “Gift” does not include (i) any offer of a ticket, coupon, or other admission or pass unless the ticket, coupon, admission, or pass is used; (ii) honorary degrees; (iii) any athletic, merit, or need-based scholarship or any other financial aid awarded by a public or private school, institution of higher education, or other educational program pursuant to such school, institution, or program’s financial aid standards and procedures applicable to the general public; (iv) a campaign contribution properly received and reported pursuant to Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) of Title 24.2; (v) any gift related to the private profession or occupation or volunteer service of a legislator or of a member of his immediate family; (vi) food or beverages consumed while attending an event at which the filer is performing official duties related to his public service; (vii) food and beverages received at or registration or attendance fees waived for any event at which the filer is a featured speaker, presenter, or lecturer; (viii) unsolicited awards of appreciation or recognition in the form of a plaque, trophy, wall memento, or similar item that is given in recognition of public, civic, charitable, or professional service; (ix) a devise or inheritance; (x) travel disclosed pursuant to the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act (§

24.2-945

et seq.); (xi) travel paid for or provided by the government of the United States, any of its territories, or any state or any political subdivision of such state; (xii) travel provided to facilitate attendance by a legislator at a regular or special session of the General Assembly, a meeting of a legislative committee or commission, or a national conference where attendance is approved by the House Committee on Rules or its Chairman or the Senate Committee on Rules or its Chairman; (xiii) travel related to an official meeting of, or any meal provided for attendance at such meeting by, the Commonwealth, its political subdivisions, or any board, commission, authority, or other entity, or any charitable organization established pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code affiliated with such entity, to which such person has been appointed or elected or is a member by virtue of his office or employment; (xiv) gifts with a value of less than $20; (xv) attendance at a reception or similar function where food, such as hors d’oeuvres, and beverages that can be conveniently consumed by a person while standing or walking are offered; or (xvi) gifts from relatives or personal friends. For the purpose of this definition, “relative” means the donee’s spouse, child, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or first cousin; a person to whom the donee is engaged to be married; the donee’s or his spouse’s parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, step-parent, step-grandparent, step-grandchild, step-brother, or step-sister; or the donee’s brother’s or sister’s spouse or the donee’s son-in-law or daughter-in-law. For the purpose of this definition, “personal friend” does not include any person that the filer knows or has reason to know is (a) a lobbyist registered pursuant to Article 3 (§

2.2-418

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 2.2 or (b) a lobbyist’s principal as defined in §

2.2-419

.

“Governmental agency”
means each component part of the legislative, executive or judicial branches of state and local government, including each office, department, authority, post, commission, committee, and each institution or board created by law to exercise some regulatory or sovereign power or duty as distinguished from purely advisory powers or duties.

“Immediate family”
means (i) a spouse and (ii) any other person who resides in the same household as the legislator and who is a dependent of the legislator.

“Legislator”
means a member of the General Assembly.

“Personal interest”
means a financial benefit or liability accruing to a legislator or to a member of his immediate family. Such interest shall exist by reason of (i) ownership in a business if the ownership interest exceeds three percent of the total equity of the business; (ii) annual income that exceeds, or may reasonably be anticipated to exceed, $5,000 from ownership in real or personal property or a business; (iii) salary, other compensation, fringe benefits, or benefits from the use of property, or any combination thereof, paid or provided by a business or governmental agency that exceeds, or may reasonably be anticipated to exceed, $5,000 annually; (iv) ownership of real or personal property if the interest exceeds $5,000 in value and excluding ownership in a business, income, or salary, other compensation, fringe benefits or benefits from the use of property; (v) personal liability incurred or assumed on behalf of a business if the liability exceeds three percent of the asset value of the business; or (vi) an option for ownership of a business or real or personal property if the ownership interest will consist of clause (i) or (iv).

“Personal interest in a contract”
means a personal interest that a legislator has in a contract with a governmental agency, whether due to his being a party to the contract or due to a personal interest in a business that is a party to the contract.

“Personal interest in a transaction”
means a personal interest of a legislator in any matter considered by the General Assembly. Such personal interest exists when a legislator or a member of his immediate family has a personal interest in property or a business, or represents or provides services to any individual or business and such property, business or represented or served individual or business (i) is the subject of the transaction or (ii) may realize a reasonably foreseeable direct or indirect benefit or detriment as a result of the action of the agency considering the transaction. A “personal interest in a transaction” exists only if the legislator or member of his immediate family or an individual or business represented or served by the legislator is affected in a way that is substantially different from the general public or from persons comprising a profession, occupation, trade, business or other comparable and generally recognizable class or group of which he or the individual or business he represents or serves is a member.

“Transaction”
means any matter considered by the General Assembly, whether in a committee, subcommittee, or other entity of the General Assembly or before the General Assembly itself, on which official action is taken or contemplated.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.31; 1994, c. 724; 1996, c. 77; 2001, c. 844; 2014, cc. 792, 804; 2015, cc. 763, 777; 2016, cc. 773, 774; 2017, cc. 829, 832.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and added the definition of “council”; rewrote the definitions of “gift” and “immediate family”; in the definition of “personal interest,” three times substituted “$5,000” for “$10,000”, inserted “or governmental agency” in (iii) of the second sentence, added (iv) and made a related change in the second sentence; in the definition of “personal interest in a transaction” inserted “or provides services to” and “or served” or similar three times; and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 763 and 777, effective January 1, 2016, are identical and added the definition for “Candidate”; in the definition for “Gift,” inserted clauses (vi) through (xiii) and in clause (xiv),
inserted “or first cousin” and “step-parent, step-grandparent, step-grandchild, stepbrother, or step-sister” and deleted “or (c) a person, organization, or business who is a party to or is seeking to become a party to a contract with the Commonwealth. For purposes of this definition, ‘person, organization, or business’ includes individuals who are officers, directors, or owners of or who have a controlling ownership interest in such organization or business”; substituted “other person” for “child” in the definition for “Immediate family”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 773 and 774 are identical, and in the definition of “Gift,” substituted “House Committee on Rules or its Chairman or the Senate Committee on Rules or its Chairman” for “House or Senate Committee on Rules” at the end of clause (xii), inserted clause (xiv) and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 829 and 832 are identical, and in the definition of “Gift,” inserted “or volunteer service” in clause (v), inserted “or any meal provided for attendance at such meeting by” in clause (xiii), inserted clause (xv) and redesignated the remaining clause and made a related change, and added “or the donee’s son-in-law or daughter-in-law” at the end of the second sentence; and substituted “a legislator” for “an officer or employee” in the second sentence in the definition of “Personal interest in a transaction.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Members of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission who also are legislators. —

Are subject to all applicable provisions of the General Assembly Conflicts Act in their service on the Commission. However, the only transactions for which this Act requires disqualification are transactions with the General Assembly. Thus, the General Assembly Conflicts Act will not come into play for transactions of the Commission, and it will not require any legislator to disqualify himself from transactions of the Commission. A legislator does remain subject to State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act in his capacity as a member of the Commission, and if Act requires him to disqualify himself from a transaction, the savings clause would apply. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-076,
(2/6/15).

School board member. —

School board member who wants to participate in a transaction involving salaries of school employees where the member’s spouse is school employee may not participate in a transaction under subdivision B 3 of §

2.2-3112

on the basis that it “affects the public generally”; however the school board member may participate in the transaction under subdivision B 1 of §

2.2-3112

as a “member of . . . a group of three or more persons [who are] affected by the transaction,” provided he or she makes the required declaration of personal interest pursuant to subsection H of §

2.2-3115

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David A. Reid, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 19-063, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (9/18/20).